Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF16.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.021, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Required academic standards. (a) The following subject areas are required for statewide accountability: (1) language arts; (2) mathematics, encompassing algebra II, integrated mathematics III, or an equivalent in high school, and to be prepared for the three credits of mathematics in grades 9 through 12, the grade 8 standards include completion of algebra; (3) science, including earth and space science, life science, and the physical sciences, including chemistry and physics; (4) social studies, including history, geography, economics, and government and citizenship that includes civics; (5) physical education; (6) health; and (7) the arts. Public elementary and middle schools must offer at least three and require at least two of the following five arts areas: dance; media arts; music; theater; and visual arts. Public high schools must offer at least three and require at least one of the following five arts areas: media arts; dance; music; theater; and visual arts. (b) For purposes of applicable federal law, the academic standards for language arts, mathematics, and science apply to all public school students, except the very few students with extreme cognitive or physical impairments for whom an individualized education program team has determined that the required academic standards are inappropriate. An individualized education program team that makes this determination must establish alternative standards. (c) A school district deleted text begin maydeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end include childnew text begin physical andnew text end sexual abuse prevention instruction in a health curriculum, consistent with paragraph (a), clause (6). Childnew text begin physical andnew text end sexual abuse prevention instruction deleted text begin maydeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end include deleted text begin age-appropriatedeleted text end new text begin multisession, multimodal, culturally inclusive, developmentally appropriate, and culturally sensitivenew text end instruction onnew text begin identifying emotional and physical child abuse and other forms of personal violence,new text end recognizing sexual abuse and assault, boundary violations, and ways offenders groom or desensitize victims, as well as strategies to promote disclosure, reduce self-blame, and mobilize bystanders. A school district may provide instruction under this paragraph in a variety of ways, including at an annual assembly or classroom presentation. A school district may also provide parents information on the warning signs of childnew text begin physical andnew text end sexual abusenew text begin , the medical and emotional effects of child abuse,new text end and available resources.new text begin A school district must train instructors on managing disclosures that may result during the delivery of child physical and sexual abuse prevention instruction and develop a policy on how to respond to the disclosures.new text end (d) District efforts to develop, implement, or improve instruction or curriculum as a result of the provisions of this section must be consistent with sections 120B.10, 120B.11, and 120B.20. (e) Locally developed academic standards in health apply until statewide rules implementing statewide health standards under subdivision 3 are required to be implemented in the classroom. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for the 2026-2027 school year and later. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.234, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Purpose. The purpose of this section, which may be cited as "Erin's Law," is to deleted text begin encouragedeleted text end new text begin requirenew text end districts to integrate or offer instruction on child sexual abuse prevention to students and training to all school personnel on recognizing and preventing sexual abuse and sexual violence. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for the 2026-2027 school year and later. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.234, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Curriculum. School districts may consult with other federal, state, or local agencies and community-based organizationsdeleted text begin , including the Child Welfare Information Gateway website maintained by the United States Department of Health and Human Services,deleted text end to identify research-based tools, curricula, and programs to prevent child sexual abuse for use under section 120B.021, subdivision 1, paragraph (d). new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for the 2026-2027 school year and later. new text end